Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 3. Sale or Lease of Certain Interests

Cross references. —

As to deeds, mortgages and leases generally, see §§

34-2-101

to

34-2-130

.

Law reviews. —

See “Survival of Certain Feudal Law Concepts in Wyoming,” 2 Wyo. L.J. 91.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

76 Am. Jur. 2d Trusts §§ 553 to 629.

90A C.J.S. Trusts §§ 404 to 481.

§ 1-32-301.
Authorization to sell qualified fee.

In an action by the owner
of any qualified or conditional fee or any other qualified, conditional
or determinable interest, or by a person claiming under such owner,
or by the trustees or beneficiaries of an estate held in trust, the
district courts may authorize the sale of any estate, whether created
by will, deed, contract or descent, when satisfied that a sale would
be for the benefit of the person holding the first and present estate,
interest or use and do no substantial injury to the heirs in tail
or others in expectancy, succession, reversion or remainder.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 661; R.S. 1887, § 3009; R.S. 1899, § 4128; C.S. 1910, § 4988; C.S. 1920, § 6258; R.S. 1931, § 89-3922; C.S. 1945, § 3-6401; W.S. 1957, § 1-974; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-401.

Cross references. —

For provision prohibiting creation of estate in fee tail, see §

34-1-137

.

Expectancies or contingent interests are alienable property.

Caldwell v. Armstrong, 342 F.2d 485, 1965 U.S. App. LEXIS 6212 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1965).

§ 1-32-302.
Requisites of petition; parties.

The petition shall contain
a description of the estate to be sold, a clear statement of the interest
of the plaintiff, and a copy of the will, deed or other instrument
of writing by which the estate is created. All persons in being who
are interested in the estate or who may by the terms of the will,
deed or other instrument creating the estate become interested as
heir, reversioner or otherwise, shall be made parties to the petition.
If the name or residence of any person who ought to be made a party
is unknown to the plaintiff, the fact shall be verified by the affidavit
of the plaintiff and the sale may be ordered notwithstanding such
names and residences are unknown.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 662; R.S. 1887, § 3010; R.S. 1899, § 4129; C.S. 1910, § 4989; C.S. 1920, § 6259; R.S. 1931, § 89-3923; C.S. 1945, § 3-6402; W.S. 1957, § 1-975; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-402.

§ 1-32-303.
Hearing of petition; order for and effect of sale.

Upon hearing the petition
if it is shown a sale of the estate would be for the benefit of the
tenant in tail or for life, and do no substantial injury to the heirs
in tail or others in expectancy, succession, reversion or remainder,
the court shall direct a sale of the estate to be made and the manner
thereof, and shall appoint some suitable person to make the sale.
The sale shall vest the estate sold in the purchaser, freed from the
entailment, limitation or condition.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 663; R.S. 1887, § 3011; R.S. 1899, § 4130; C.S. 1910, § 4990; C.S. 1920, § 6260; R.S. 1931, § 89-3924; C.S. 1945, § 3-6403; W.S. 1957, § 1-976; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-403.

Cross references. —

For provision prohibiting creation of estate in fee tail, see §

34-1-137

.

In general. —

Where estate is granted or devised for life with remainder over, district courts have power to authorize life tenant to lease for term of years, or to sell and convey such estate. Murrell v. Stock Growers' Nat'l Bank, 74 F.2d 827, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4018 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

§ 1-32-304.
Sale by consent of parties; right of guardians to assent in place
of wards.

All parties in interest
may appear voluntarily and consent in writing to the sale. Testamentary
guardians and guardians appointed by the court may consent in place
of their wards.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 664; R.S. 1887, § 3012; R.S. 1899, § 4131; C.S. 1910, § 4991; C.S. 1920, § 6261; R.S. 1931, § 89-3925; C.S. 1945, § 3-6404; W.S. 1957, § 1-977; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-404.

§ 1-32-305.
Report of sale to court; confirmation; conveyance of premises upon
payment of purchase money.

All sales shall be reported
to the court authorizing them. If on examination it appears that the
sale was fairly conducted and the price obtained is the reasonable
value of the estate sold, the court shall confirm the sale and direct
a deed of conveyance be made to the purchaser on payment of the purchase
money, or on securing the payment thereof in a manner approved by
the court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 665; R.S. 1887, § 3013; R.S. 1899, § 4132; C.S. 1910, § 4992; C.S. 1920, § 6262; R.S. 1931, § 89-3926; C.S. 1945, § 3-6405; W.S. 1957, § 1-978; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-405.

§ 1-32-306.
Proceeds to descend like estate sold.

For purposes of descent,
succession, reversion or remainder, all monies arising from the sale
have the same character and are governed by the same principles as
the estate sold, and pass according to the terms of the deed, will
or other instrument creating the estate.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 666; R.S. 1887, § 3014; R.S. 1899, § 4133; C.S. 1910, § 4993; C.S. 1920, § 6263; R.S. 1931, § 89-3927; C.S. 1945, § 3-6406; W.S. 1957, § 1-979; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-406.

Legislature may change estate. —

The legislature by special act may change an entailed estate to that of a fee simple estate, as by so doing it would not take any strict legal right from anyone. Jensen v. Jensen, 54 Wyo. 224, 89 P.2d 1085,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1939).

Due process. —

Section 66-137, W. C. S. 1945, did not deprive defendants of vested property rights without due process of law, where there were no heirs, but only heirs apparent, to the living, persons with mere expectancies or possibilities of inheritance which may have been fulfilled or defeated, depending upon various contingencies and situations. Jensen v. Jensen, 54 Wyo. 224, 89 P.2d 1085,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1939).

Heirs apparent. —

An heir apparent has no vested right in the estate of his ancestor prior to latter's death, and no vested property rights therein, and legislation dealing with estates of persons who die after its effective date does not deal with vested rights. Jensen v. Jensen, 54 Wyo. 224, 89 P.2d 1085,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1939).

Remedial statutes. —

A remedial statute does not create, enlarge, diminish, or destroy vested rights. Jensen v. Jensen, 54 Wyo. 224, 89 P.2d 1085,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1939).

§ 1-32-307.
Investment of proceeds of sale; reinvestment in other real estate;
descent; appointment of trustees to make investments; security required
of trustees.

Money arising from the sales shall be invested, under the direction and supervision of the court, in the certificates of the funded debt of this state or of the United States, or in bonds secured by mortgage on unencumbered real estate situated in the proper county of double the value of the money secured thereby, exclusive of buildings and other improvements and of timber, mines and minerals. The court may order the money to be reinvested in other real estate within this state under such restrictions as it may prescribe, which investments shall be reported to the court and subject to its approval and confirmation.

For purposes of descent, succession, reversion or remainder the real estate in which the money is reinvested shall have the same character and be governed by the same principles as the estate sold, and shall pass according to the terms of the deed, will or other instrument creating the estate sold.

The court shall appoint competent trustees to invest and manage the money who from time to time shall report to the court their proceedings and the condition of the fund. The court shall require of the trustees security for the faithful discharge of their duty and may from time to time require additional security, remove the trustees for cause or reasonable apprehension thereof and may accept the resignation of a trustee and fill a vacancy by a new appointment.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 667; R.S. 1887, § 3015; R.S. 1899, § 4134; C.S. 1910, § 4994; C.S. 1920, § 6264; R.S. 1931, § 89-3928; C.S. 1945, § 3-6407; W.S. 1957, § 1-980; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-407.

§ 1-32-308.
Use of income; taxes and expenses.

The net income accruing
from sales shall be paid to the person who would be entitled to the
use or income of the estate, were the same unsold. All taxes and the
expenses of investment and management of the fund shall be paid by
the person entitled to the income thereof.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 668; R.S. 1887, § 3016; R.S. 1899, § 4135; C.S. 1910, § 4995; C.S. 1920, § 6265; R.S. 1931, § 89-3929; C.S. 1945, § 3-6408; W.S. 1957, § 1-981; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-408.

§ 1-32-309.
Right to lease estate for term of years; rents and profits.

Upon like proceedings
the court may direct that the estate be leased for a term of years,
renewable or otherwise, as may appear most beneficial and equitable.
The rents and profits shall be paid to the person who might otherwise
be entitled to the use and occupancy of the estate or the income thereof.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 669; R.S. 1887, § 3017; R.S. 1899, § 4136; C.S. 1910, § 4996; C.S. 1920, § 6266; R.S. 1931, § 89-3930; C.S. 1945, § 3-6409; W.S. 1957, § 1-982; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-409.

In general. —

Where estate is granted or devised for life with remainder over, district courts have power to authorize life tenant to lease for term of years, or to sell and convey such estate. Murrell v. Stock Growers' Nat'l Bank, 74 F.2d 827, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4018 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Life tenant's death as affecting rights under lease given by him, 14 ALR4th 1054.

§ 1-32-310.
Sale of property given or purchased for religious use; generally.

When any real estate
except burial grounds of a cemetery has been donated, bequeathed or
otherwise entrusted to or purchased by any person or trustee for any
public religious use but not to or for use of any particular religious
denomination, or when the same has been donated, bequeathed, entrusted
to or purchased by a particular religious denomination and has been
abandoned for such use, the district court of the county in which
the real estate is located, upon good cause shown upon the petition
of any citizen of the vicinity, may make an order for the sale of
the property whether the same has been built upon or otherwise improved
or not, and may make the order as to costs and disposition of the
proceeds of the sale of the religious or other public use as shall
be just, proper and equitable. The purchaser shall be invested with
as full and complete a title thereto as the character of the original
grant for the religious use will allow.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 670; R.S. 1887, § 3018; R.S. 1899, § 4137; C.S. 1910, § 4997; C.S. 1920, § 6267; R.S. 1931, § 89-3931; C.S. 1945, § 3-6410; W.S. 1957, § 1-983; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-410.

§ 1-32-311.
Sale of property given or purchased for religious use; necessary
parties to proceeding.

All persons who have
a vested, contingent or reversionary interest in the real estate and
the trustees or other officers of any religious society then using
the same shall be made parties to the petition and be notified of
the filing and pendency thereof as in a civil action.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 671; R.S. 1887, § 3019; R.S. 1899, § 4138; C.S. 1910, § 4998; C.S. 1920, § 6268; R.S. 1931, § 89-3932; C.S. 1945, § 3-6411; W.S. 1957, § 1-984; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-411.